Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 3A Integrated Resource Planning

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 enactment of this chapter, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1992).

For comment, “Integrated Resource Planning and Demand-Side Management In Electric Utility Regulation: Public Utility Panacea or A Waste of Energy?,” see 43 Emory L.J. 815 (1994).

46-3A-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Capacity resource” means an electric plant, a long-term power purchase, or a demand-side capacity option.

“Commission” means the Georgia Public Service Commission.

“Construction” means clearing of land, excavation, or other substantial activity leading to the operation of an electric plant other than planning, land surveying, land acquisition, subsurface exploration, design work, licensing or other regulatory activity, contracting for construction, or environmental protection measures and activities associated therewith.

“Demand-side capacity option” means a program proposed by a utility or the commission for the reduction of future electricity requirements the utility’s Georgia retail customers would otherwise impose, including, but not limited to, conservation, load management, cogeneration, and renewable energy technologies.

“Electric plant” means any facility, or the portion of a facility, that produces electricity or that, at the time application for certification is made pursuant to this chapter, is intended to produce electricity for a utility’s Georgia retail customers. “Electric plant” includes the realty and ancillary facilities for the construction of the plant.

“Long-term power purchase” means a purchase of electric capacity and energy for a period exceeding one year, the principal purpose of which is to supply the requirements of the Georgia retail customers of a utility.

“Plan” means an integrated resource plan which contains the utility’s electric demand and energy forecast for at least a 20 year period, contains the utility’s program for meeting the requirements shown in its forecast in an economical and reliable manner, contains the utility’s analysis of all capacity resource options, including both demand-side and supply-side options, and sets forth the utility’s assumptions and conclusions with respect to the effect of each capacity resource option on the future cost and reliability of electric service. The plan shall also:

Contain the size and type of facilities which are expected to be owned or operated in whole or in part by such utility and the construction of which is expected to commence during the ensuing ten years or such longer period as the commission deems necessary and shall identify all existing facilities intended to be removed from service during such period or upon completion of such construction;

Contain practical alternatives to the fuel type and method of generation of the proposed electric generating facilities and set forth in detail the reasons for selecting the fuel type and method of generation;

Contain a statement of the estimated impact of proposed and alternative generating plants on the environment and the means by which potential adverse impacts will be avoided or minimized;

Indicate in detail the projected demand for electric energy for a 20 year period and the basis for determining the projected demand;

Describe the utility’s relationship to other utilities in regional associations, power pools, and networks;

Identify and describe all major research projects and programs which will continue or commence in the succeeding three years and set forth the reasons for selecting specific areas of research;

Identify and describe existing and planned programs and policies to discourage inefficient and excessive power use; and

Provide any other information as may be required by the commission.

“Supply-side capacity option” means an electric plant, a long-term power purchase, or any other source of additional energy.

“Utility” means any electric supplier whose rates are fixed by the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-2.
Filing and approval of an integrated resource plan.

On or before January 31, 1992, and at least every three years thereafter as may be determined by the commission, each utility shall file with the commission an integrated resource plan as described in this chapter.

Not more than 60 days after a utility has filed its plan, the commission shall convene a public hearing on the adequacy of the plan. At the hearing any interested person may make comments to the commission regarding the contents and adequacy of the plan. After the hearing, the commission shall determine whether:

The utility’s forecast requirements are based on substantially accurate data and an adequate method of forecasting;

The plan identifies and takes into account any present and projected reductions in the demand for energy which may result from measures to improve energy efficiency in the industrial, commercial, residential, and energy-producing sectors of the state; and

The plan adequately demonstrates the economic, environmental, and other benefits to the state and to customers of the utility, associated with the following possible measures and sources of supply:

Improvements in energy efficiency;

Pooling of power;

Purchases of power from neighboring states;

Facilities which operate on alternative sources of energy;

Facilities that operate on the principle of cogeneration or hydro-generation; and

Other generation facilities and demand-side options.

Within 120 days after the filing of each integrated resource plan, the commission shall approve and adopt an integrated resource plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-3.
Actions prohibited without a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

After January 31, 1992, no utility shall commence the construction of an electric plant, sell an existing plant or any portion thereof which is included in the retail rate base or which has been certified, enter into a long-term purchase of electric power, or make expenditures for a demand-side capacity option for serving the utility’s Georgia retail customers without having first obtained from the commission a certificate that public convenience and necessity requires, or will require, such construction, sale, purchase, or expenditure.

No utility shall increase or decrease the capacity of:

A generating unit of an electric power plant;

A long-term power purchase; or

A demand-side capacity option

by more than 15 percent of its demonstrated capacity in megawatts for serving the utility’s Georgia retail customers without first obtaining a certificate or an amendment to a certificate, as appropriate, that public convenience or necessity requires or will require such increase or decrease; provided, however, no certificate shall be required if the increase or decrease is caused by a rule, regulation, or law mandated by any duly constituted local, state, or federal governmental body or agency or is caused by power pooling, forced or maintenance outages, or short-term sales for a period of less than one year.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-4.
Issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity; application to include plan and cost-benefit analysis.

The commission shall issue a certificate upon a finding that there is or will be a need for the proposed capacity resource at the time that the proposed resource is proposed to be utilized to assure an economical and reliable supply of electric power and energy for the Georgia retail customers of a utility, that the certificate is required by the public convenience and necessity, and that the certificate complies with the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the commission.

The utility’s application for a certificate shall be accompanied by its current integrated resource plan, whether or not previously filed.

The utility’s application for a certificate shall contain a cost-benefit analysis covering the estimated useful life of all capacity resource options considered in developing its current integrated resource plan. The estimated cost of the capacity resource proposed to be certificated shall be presented in such reasonable detail as the commission may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-5.
Application for certificate; hearing; decision; contents of certificate; fee.

A utility seeking a certificate or an amendment to a certificate shall make an application to the commission which contains the information required by this chapter.

No sooner than 30 days after an application is made for a certificate or an amendment, the commission shall conduct a public hearing on the application. Within 300 days after filing of the first such application and within 180 days after filing of each application thereafter, the commission shall issue an order adopting a forecast of future Georgia retail electricity requirements of the utility and describing in what manner the prospective certificate relates to the integrated resource plan and either granting the requested certificate or denying the requested certificate and authorizing a specific alternative means of supplying the requirements found by the commission to exist. Each certificate shall describe the capacity resource, its approximate construction or implementation schedule, and its approved cost. If the commission fails to so act within 300 days after the first such application has been made and within 180 days after each subsequent application has been made, the forecast application and certificate shall be deemed granted by operation of law.

Within 60 days after the filing of an integrated resource plan or an application has been made with the commission for a certificate or amendment, the commission shall establish a fee therefor and notify the applicant thereof. The fee amount so established shall be in an amount reasonably necessary to defray the expense of the commission in reviewing the plan or determining whether to grant the application, including but not limited to the expense of conducting any certification proceedings required for such application. The fee so established shall not be recoverable from ratepayers of the applicant if the application or certification is denied nor shall the fee for review of the plan or any subsequent amendment thereto be recoverable from ratepayers. Such fee must be remitted to the commission before the commission may take any further action upon the application. For purposes of any time periods established in subsection (b) of this Code section and subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3A-2, an application shall be deemed to have been filed only when the fee established therefor has been remitted to the commission. In the event a joint application is filed by more than one utility, a single such fee only shall be required. The funds assessed and collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the state’s general fund.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-6.
Reexamination of a certificate of public convenience and necessity; modification or revocation.

Upon application of a utility or upon its own motion, the commission may reexamine any certificate granted under this chapter to determine whether new forecasts of future requirements require the modification of the construction, purchase, sale, or expenditure for a certificated capacity resource.
If upon such reexamination the commission finds that the certificated capacity resource is no longer needed or that any additional certificated capacity resource is needed to assure a reliable supply of electric power and energy for the utility’s Georgia retail customers, the commission may modify or revoke the certificate.
If the utility cancels, abandons, or increases some or all of the capacity resource as a result of such modification or revocation of the certificate, it may recover through any rate-making vehicle over a reasonable period of time, absent fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct, the amount of its investment in such capacity resource, along with the cost of carrying the unamortized portion of that investment, net of actual salvage value, to the extent such investment is verified as made pursuant to the certificate.
The commission shall disallow such investment and costs resulting from fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-7.
Construction costs as part of rate base; review of construction work in progress; verification of expenditures; recovery of costs of canceled construction.

So long as the commission has not modified or revoked the certificate for an electric plant under Code Section 46-3A-6 and to the extent the utility seeks to add to its rate base upon completion of the plant construction costs that do not exceed 100 percent of those approved by the commission under Code Section 46-3A-5, Code Section 46-3A-6, or subsection (b) of this Code section, that construction cost amount may be excluded from the rate base only on the basis of fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct. Inclusion of costs in excess of 100 percent of those approved by the commission shall not be permitted unless shown by the utility to have been reasonable and prudent.

In addition to the review of the continuing need for an electric plant under construction prescribed in Code Section 46-3A-6, the commission, upon its own motion, may conduct or the utility may request that the commission conduct an ongoing review of such construction as it proceeds. Every one to three years, or at such lesser intervals upon the direction of the commission or request of the utility, the applicant shall file a progress report and any proposed revisions in the cost estimates, construction schedule, or project configuration. Within 180 days of such filing, the commission shall verify and approve or disapprove expenditures made pursuant to the certificate and shall approve, disapprove, or modify any proposed revisions. If the commission fails to so act within 180 days after such filing, the previous expenditures and any proposed revisions shall be deemed approved by operation of law.

If the commission verifies expenditures as made pursuant to a certificated capacity resource, that verification forecloses subsequent exclusion of those costs from the utility’s rate base, absent fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct.

If the commission disapproves of all or part of the proposed revisions and the utility cancels construction of some or all of the facility as a result of the disapproval, the utility may recover through any rate-making vehicle over a reasonable period of time, absent fraud, concealment, failure to disclose a material fact, imprudence, or criminal misconduct, the amount of its actual investment, net of actual salvage value, in the partially completed portion of the facility along with the cost of carrying the unamortized balance of that investment to the extent such investment is verified as made pursuant to the certificate.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-8.
Recovery of actual cost of certificated long-term power purchase.

The approved or actual cost, whichever is less, of purchase of any certificated long-term power purchase shall be recovered in rates by the utility, along with an additional sum as determined by the commission to encourage such purchases.
The commission shall consider lost revenues, if any, changed risks, and an equitable sharing of benefits between the utility and its retail customers.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-9.
Recovery of actual cost of certificated demand-side capacity option.

The approved or actual cost, whichever is less, of any certificated demand-side capacity option shall be recovered by the utility in rates, along with an additional sum as determined by the commission to encourage the development of such resources.
The commission shall consider lost revenues, if any, changed risks, and an equitable sharing of benefits between the utility and its retail customers.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-10.
Effect on rates of changed revenues and risks; basis and effect of commission decision.

In setting rates for any certificated capacity resource, the commission shall consider changed revenues and changed risks, if any.
The commission’s decision in any certification, recertification, modification, or construction review proceeding shall be based on evidence of record. Compliance with the provisions of the certificate as approved or modified by the commission shall result in a presumption of prudence. The commission’s findings, although subject to judicial review, shall not be subject to relitigation in any other proceeding; provided, however, the issuance of a certificate under this Code section shall not preempt any duly constituted local, state, or federal governmental body or agency from its regulation of environmental or safety matters incidental to construction of electric generating plants.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.

46-3A-11.
Inapplicability of chapter to providers whose rates not fixed by commission.

This chapter shall not apply to any provider of wholesale or retail electric service whose rates are not fixed by the commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3A-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1696, § 1.